src-fst-morphology-phonology.xfscript.md
Definitions

Rules

* *nit<^SPitan>wa*
* *nitana*

* *ot<^SPaahk<wahkayi>hsi*
* *maahkahkayssi*

* *kit<omitaa>im>wa*
* *kitomitaama*

* *nit<ikakomimm>^RCPRotsiiyi>hpinnaan*
* *nitsikakomimmotsiiyihpinnaan*

* *nit<inakat>^RCPRotsiiyi>hpinnaan*
* *nitsinakattsiiyihpinnaan*

* *nit<ipohkisstoyi>^RCPRotsiiyi>hpinnaana*
* *nitsipohkisstoyootsiiyihpinnaana*

* *anno>^DEMwa*
* *anno*

* *anno>^DEMiksi*
* *annoiksi,* `annoksi`

* *nit<inakat>^INVokssi*
* *nitsinakakkssi*

* *kit<ipohkisstoyi>^INVoka*
* *kitsipohkisstoyooka*

* *nit<aak<oht<wahkayimm^3MM*
* *nitaakohtahkayi*

* *ayaak<wahkayimm^3MM>yi>aawa*
* *ayaakahkayimmiaawa*

* *kit<ipohkisstoyi>^VLVawa*
* *kitsipohkisstoyaawa*

* *nit<inakat>^VLVawa*
* *nitsinakatawa*

* *^IMPpoohkisstoyi>^IMPok*
* *poohkisstoyiik*

* *^IMPinakat>^IMPok*
* *inakatok*

* *^IMP^IMPitapoo^DIPH>t*
* *istapoot,* `stapoot`

* *^IMPa'po'taki>k*
* *a'potakik*

* *aak<wahkayi>wa>^PROáyi*
* *aakahkayiwayi*

Drawn from Frantz, D. G. (1991). Blackfoot Grammar, 2nd Edition. University of Toronto Press. Appendix B.

1. Gemination C1 > C2 / _ + C2

* *nitáni2t>k>wa*
* *nitánikka*

* *nitáni2t>awa*
* *nitánistawa*

* *ann>yi2hka*
* *annisska*

* *nit<siksipawa*
* *nitssiksipawa*

* *á<sínaakiwa*
* *áísínaakiwa*

* *káta'<simiwa*
* *kátai'simiwa*

* *áakoto<apinniiwa*
* *áakotaapinniiwa*

* *w<iihsíssi*
* *ohsíssi*

* *w<ínni*
* *ónni*

* *áak<i2piima*
* *áaksipiima*

* *á<i2o'kaa>wa*
* *áyo'kaawa*

* *áyo'kaa>o'pa*
* *áyo'kao'pa*

* *pookáá>iksi*
* *pookáíksi*

* *áyo'kaa>yi>aawa*
* *áyo'kaayaawa*

* *áókska'si>o'pa*
* *áókska'so'pa*

* *nit<i2oyi*
* *nitsoyi*

* *nit<it<itsiniki*
* *nitsitsitsiniki*

* *nit<i2oyi*
* *nitsoyi*

* *otokska'si>hsi*
* *otokska'ssi*

* *otá'po'taki>hsi*
* *otá'po'takssi*

* *pii<hsini*
* *pissini*

* *yaatóót*
* *aatóót*

* *waaníít*
* *aaníít*

* *w<óko'si*
* *óko'si*

* *kikáta'<waaniihpa*
* *kikáta'waaniihpa*

* *kitanistawawaaw>yináyi*
* *kitanistawawaayináyi*

* *áíhpiyi>yináyi*
* *áíhpiiyináyi*

* *nitáókska'si>hpinnan*
* *nitáókska'sspinnan*

* *á'<omai'takiwa*
* *áó'mai'takiwa*

* *káta'<sspitaawa*
* *kátai'sspitaawa*

* *káta'<ookaawaatsi*
* *kátaookaawaatsi*

* *káta'<ottakiwaatsi*
* *kátaoottakiwaatsi*

* *á'<isttohkohpiy'ssi*
* *áísttohkohpiy'ssi*

* *á'<o'tooyiniki*
* *áó'tooyiniki*

* *káta'<ohto'toowa*
* *kátao'ohto'toowa*

* *nit<ssksinoawa*
* *nitssksinoawa*

* *á<okska'siwa*
* *áókska'siwa*

* *atsikí>istsi*
* *atsikíístsi*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-bla/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.xfscript)</small>
